Florida, session 2026, HB4083.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
12
13 Section 1. Sections 4.01, 4.02, 4.03, 4.05, and 4.10 of
14 Article IV, section 5.01 of Article V, section 6.02 of Article
15 VI, and section 8.01 of Article VII of the Charter of the City
16 of Winter Springs, are amended, and section 13.05 is added to
17 Article XIII of that charter, to read:
18 ARTICLE IV. - GOVERNING BODY
19 Section 4.01. - Composition; qualification of members; and
20 commission districts.
21 (a) Composition. There shall be a governing body composed
22 of the mayor and four (4) five (5) commission members elected by
23 the voters of the city as provided in this Charter. Not more
24 than one (1) commission member shall reside in each of the four
25 (4) five (5) commission districts provided for in Section 4.02
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
26 (a) of this Charter. The mayor shall be elected at large and may
27 reside anywhere within the city. Each commissioner shall be
28 elected by the qualified electors of the City of Winter Springs.
29 The term "city commission" as used in this Charter shall refer
30 to the mayor and four (4) commission members elected by the
31 qualified electors, except as otherwise provided.
32 (b) Eligibility. Only qualified voters of the city shall
33 be eligible to hold the office of mayor or commissioner. Each
34 candidate seeking the office of city commissioner or mayor or
35 any other elective office of the city shall file a petition
36 signed by fifteen (15) registered voters of the city with the
37 city clerk. Each candidate seeking the office of city
38 commissioner or mayor or any other elective office of the city
39 shall have resided in the city one (1) year prior to the time of
40 qualifying. Each candidate seeking the office of city
41 commissioner shall be a resident of a designated commission
42 district established by ordinance and shall have resided in the
43 designated commission district six (6) months prior to the time
44 of qualifying. Notwithstanding the above requirement, city
45 commissioners shall run at large as commission candidates under
46 district designation. All candidates for offices in municipal
47 elections shall be registered and qualified electors of the city
48 at the time of their qualifying as a candidate with the city
49 clerk and shall file qualifying papers in accordance with state
50 statutes and pay the qualifying fee and election assessment
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
51 provided for by city ordinances. Such application shall be filed
52 and the qualifying fee paid during the qualifying period
53 established by the city commission by ordinance.
54 Section 4.02. - Commission districts; adjustment of
55 districts.
56 (a) Number of districts. The city commission of the City
57 of Winter Springs, Florida, shall by separate ordinance divide
58 the city into four (4) five (5) geographical commission
59 districts.
60 (b) Districting commission. By the first day of February,
61 2027 1991, the first day of February, 1992, and every three (3)
62 years thereafter, the city commission shall appoint seven (7)
63 city electors determined from the registration of the last
64 regular election, one (1) to be appointed by each commissioner
65 from their respective district, and three (3) two (2) appointed
66 by the mayor from the city at large, who shall comprise the
67 districting commission. Electors chosen shall not be employed by
68 the city in any other capacity. The initial districting
69 commission, creating and establishing the first commission
70 districts, shall be appointed by each commissioner and the mayor
71 from the city at large.
72 (c) Report; specifications. The districting commission
73 shall file with the official designated by the city commission a
74 report containing a recommended plan for establishment or
75 adjustment of the commission district boundaries. The initial
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
76 districting commission, creating and establishing the first
77 commission districts, shall file such report within ninety (90)
78 days of appointment. Thereafter, such reports shall be filed
79 within one hundred twenty (120) days of appointment to the city
80 districting commission. The commission district boundaries shall
81 comply with the following specifications:
82 (1) Each district shall be formed of compact, contiguous
83 territory, and its boundary lines shall follow the center lines
84 of streets insofar as practical or possible, or other boundaries
85 available.
86 (2) The districts shall be based upon the principle of
87 equal and effective representation as required by the United
88 States Constitution and as represented in the mathematical
89 preciseness reached in the legislative apportionment of the
90 state.
91 (3) The report shall include a map and description of the
92 districts recommended and shall be drafted as a proposed
93 ordinance. Once filed with the designated official, the report
94 shall be treated as an ordinance introduced by a commissioner.
95 (d) Support. It shall be the responsibility of the city
96 manager to provide staff assistance and technical data to the
97 districting commission.
98 (e) Procedure. The procedure for the city commission's
99 consideration of the report shall be the same as for other
100 ordinances, provided that if a summary of the ordinances is
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
101 published pursuant to this Charter and general law, it must
102 include both the map and a description of the recommended
103 districts.
104 (f) Failure to enact ordinance. The city commission shall
105 adopt the redistricting ordinance at least one hundred twenty
106 (120) days before the next city election. If the city commission
107 fails to either accept or reject the redistricting ordinance,
108 the report of the districting commission shall go into effect
109 and have the same effect of an ordinance. The proposed
110 redistricting ordinance may not be rejected for any reason
111 except for failure to comply with the specifications listed in
112 section 4.02(c) of this Charter or failure to comply with other
113 local, state or federal law.
114 (g) Effect of enactment. The new commission districts and
115 boundaries as of the date of enactment shall supersede previous
116 commission districts and boundaries for all purposes; provided
117 all incumbent commissioners shall continue to hold office for
118 the entire term to which elected notwithstanding any change in
119 commission district and boundaries.
120 Section 4.03. - Election and terms.
121 (a) The regular election of mayor and commissioners shall
122 be held at the time provided for in Section 8.01 of this
123 Charter. All elections shall be for four-year terms of office.
124 The terms of the mayor and commissioner shall begin at the next
125 scheduled regular or special meeting of the city commission of
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
126 each year an election is held, and its members shall serve until
127 their successors have taken office.
128 (b) City commission seats are hereby designated as seats
129 one, two, three, and four and five.
130 (c) The mayor shall be limited to three (3) consecutive
131 full terms of office. Commission members shall be limited to
132 three (3) consecutive full terms of office. The mayor or any
133 commission member who has served three (3) consecutive full
134 terms of office after having been out of office for a period of
135 one (1) year, shall be eligible for election to successive three
136 (3) consecutive full terms of office; provided however, this
137 limitation shall not prohibit a person who has served three (3)
138 consecutive full terms of office as mayor from qualifying and
139 being elected as a commission member; nor shall this limitation
140 prohibit a person who has served three (3) consecutive full
141 terms of office as a commission member from qualifying and being
142 elected as mayor of the city.
143 Section 4.05. - Mayor.
144 At each regular election for the office of mayor, a mayor
145 shall be elected at large for a term of four (4) years and shall
146 serve until the mayor's successor is elected and qualified;
147 provided such term of office shall not exceed four (4) years.
148 The mayor shall preside at meetings of the city commission,
149 represent the city in intergovernmental relationships, present
150 an annual State of the City Message, and perform other duties
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
151 specified by the commission. The mayor shall be recognized as
152 head of the city government for all ceremonial purposes and by
153 the governor for purposes of military law, but shall have no
154 administrative duties. The city commission shall elect from
155 among its members a deputy mayor who shall act as mayor during
156 the absence or disability of the mayor. However, if a vacancy
157 occurs in the position of mayor, the vacancy shall be filled in
158 accordance with section 4.08(c) of this Charter.
159
160 The mayor shall serve as a voting member not vote except in
161 case of a tie vote of the commission. The mayor shall be
162 recognized as the head of city government for all ceremonial
163 purposes and by the governor for the purposes of military law
164 and shall have no administrative authority over city employees,
165 except as expressly provided by this Charter or by ordinance
166 Within ten (10) days after the adoption of any ordinance by the
167 city commission, the mayor shall have the power to veto said
168 ordinance and return it to the commission at the next regular
169 meeting with a written message. It shall require the affirmative
170 vote of four (4) commission members to pass the ordinance after
171 the mayor's veto.
172 Section 4.10. - City clerk.
173 (a) The city commission shall, after receiving a
174 nomination from either the mayor or city commissioners a
175 commission member(s) shall, by a vote of not less than four (4)
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
176 commission members, appoint an officer of the city who shall
177 have the title of city clerk upon approval by not less than four
178 (4) members of the city commission. The city clerk's
179 compensation shall be established by the city commission. The
180 city clerk shall give notice of commission meetings to its
181 members and the public, keep the journal of its proceedings and
182 perform such other duties as are provided by this Charter, by
183 the commission or by law.
184 (b) The city clerk may be removed by a vote of not less
185 than four (4) commission members of the city commission.
186 ARTICLE V. - CITY MANAGER
187 Section 5.01. - Appointment; qualifications, compensation.
188 The city commission, by the affirmative vote of not less
189 than four (4) commission members of the city commission, shall
190 appoint a city manager and fix the manager's compensation. The
191 city manager shall be appointed solely on the basis of executive
192 and administrative qualifications and shall serve at the
193 pleasure of the commission.
194 ARTICLE VI. - ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS
195 Section 6.02. - City attorney.
196 (a) The city commission shall, after receiving a
197 nomination from either the mayor or city commissioners a
198 commission member(s) shall, by a vote of not less than four (4)
199 commission members, appoint an officer of the city who shall
200 have the title of city attorney upon approval by not less than
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
201 four (4) members of the city commission. The city attorney shall
202 represent the city in legal proceedings and shall perform such
203 duties as provided by this Charter, by the commission, or by
204 law.
205 (b) The city attorney may be removed by a vote of not less
206 than four (4) commission members of the city commission.
207 ARTICLE VIII. - NOMINATIONS AND ELECTIONS
208 Section 8.01. - The city elections.
209 The regular general city election for electing the mayor
210 and city commissioners commission members from seats two and
211 four shall coincide with the Florida Gubernatorial election
212 years. The regular general election for electing city
213 commissioners commission members from seats one and, three, and
214 five shall coincide with the United States Presidential election
215 years. The entire electorate shall be entitled to vote in
216 elections for mayor and city commissioners commission members.
217 ARTICLE XIII. - TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS
218 Section 13.05 – Transition to mayor as full member of
219 commission.
220 (1) This transition shall not affect the term of any
221 elected official of the City of Winter Springs serving at the
222 time of its passage.
223 (2) Beginning with the general election held in November
224 2026, the office of mayor shall become a voting member of the
225 city commission. At that time, the city commission shall consist
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
226 of the mayor and five commissioners.
227 (3) After the November 2026 election, the city commission
228 shall, by ordinance, adopt new district boundaries to provide
229 for four (4) commissioner districts no later than January 1,
230 2028, using the procedures provided in section 4.02 of the
231 Charter.
232 (4) In adopting new district boundaries, no district shall
233 be drawn so as to include more than one commissioner elected in
234 November 2026.
235 (5) At the general election held in November 2028,
236 elections shall be conducted for two (2) of the four (4) newly
237 drawn commissioner districts in which no commissioner elected in
238 November 2026 resides. Following that election, the city
239 commission shall consist of the mayor and four commissioners.
240 Section 2. Referendum election.—
241 (1) A referendum on the adoption of section 1 of this act
242 shall be held on November 3, 2026, the 2026 general election.
243 (2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
244 in substantially the following form:
245 AMENDING MUNICIPAL CHARTER TO PROVIDE FOR FIVE-MEMBER CITY
246 COMMISSION INCLUDING A VOTING MAYOR
247 (3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
248 in substantially the following form:
249 Shall Chapter 2026- , Laws of Florida, which amends the
250 Charter of the City of Winter Springs to provide for a five-
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 4083 2026
251 member city commission that includes the mayor as a voting
252 member, revises the duties of the office of the mayor, makes
253 conforming changes to the Charter, and provides for transition,
254 become effective?
255 ( ) YES.
256 ( ) NO.
257 (4) The referendum shall be conducted by the Supervisor of
258 Elections of Seminole County in accordance with the Florida
259 Election Code.
260 Section 3. This act shall take effect only upon its
261 approval by a majority vote of those qualified electors of the
262 City of Winter Springs voting in a referendum to be held in
263 conjunction with the 2026 general election, except that this
264 section and section 2 shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4083-00